Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.722, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Determination of employment relationship. For purposes of this section, deleted text begin the nature of an employment relationship is determined using the same tests and in the same manner as employee status is determined underdeleted text end new text begin there is a rebuttable presumption that an individual is an employee that may be overturned throughnew text end the applicable workers' compensation and unemployment insurance program laws and rules. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268.035, subdivision 25b, is amended to read: Subd. 25b. Trucking and messenger/courier industries; independent contractors. In the trucking and messenger/courier industries,new text begin there is a rebuttable presumption thatnew text end an operator of a car, van, truck, tractor, or truck-tractor that is licensed and registered by a governmental motor vehicle agency is an employee unless each of the following factors is present, and if each factor is present, the operator is an independent contractor: (1) the individual owns the equipment or holds it under a lease arrangement; (2) the individual is responsible for the maintenance of the equipment; (3) the individual is responsible for the operating costs, including fuel, repairs, supplies, vehicle insurance, and personal expenses. The individual may be paid the carrier's fuel surcharge and incidental costs, including, but not limited to, tolls, permits, and lumper fees; (4) the individual is responsible for supplying the necessary personal services to operate the equipment; (5) the individual's compensation is based on factors related to the work performed, such as a percentage of any schedule of rates, and not on the basis of the hours or time expended; (6) the individual enters into a written contract that specifies the relationship to be that of an independent contractor and not that of an employee; and (7) the individual substantially controls the means and manner of performing the services, in conformance with regulatory requirements and specifications of the shipper.